Nebraska, session 109, LB531.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB531 LB531
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 58-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
58-701 Sections 58-701 to 58-711 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.
Sec. 2. The Department of Economic Development shall not require
any new construction project or rental conversion project which receives
funding from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund to meet the requirements
of section 72-805 related to complying with the International Energy
Conservation Code and obtaining approval of building plans and
specifications by the Department of Environment and Energy.
Sec. 3. Section 72-805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-805 Except as provided in section 2 of this act for certain
projects funded by the Affordable Housing Trust Fund, the The 2018
International Energy Conservation Code, published by the International
Code Council, applies to all new buildings constructed in whole or in
part with state funds after July 1, 2020. The Department of Environment
and Energy shall review building plans and specifications necessary to
determine whether a building will meet the requirements of this section.
The department shall provide a copy of its review to the agency receiving
funding. The agency receiving the funding shall verify that the building
as constructed meets or exceeds the code. The verification shall be
provided to the department. The Director of Environment and Energy may,
in consultation with the State Building Administrator of the Department
of Administrative Services, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 4. Original section 58-701, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 72-805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-2-